Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Chapter 16

Members of Congress

2-16-101. Vacancies.

If a vacancy occurs in the office of United States senator, a successor shall be elected at the next regular November election and shall hold office until the term for which the predecessor was elected expires. If the vacancy will deprive the state of its full representation at any time congress may be in session, the governor shall fill the vacancy by appointment until a successor is elected at the next regular November election and is qualified.

If a vacancy occurs in the office of representative in congress, within ten (10) days of such vacancy occurring the governor shall, by writs of election, order a special election to fill the vacancy. The governor shall, by writs of election, set a date not less than fifty-five (55) nor more than sixty (60) days from the date of the writs for primary elections for nominations by statewide political parties to fill the vacancy and shall, by the same writs of election, set a date of not less than one hundred (100) nor more than one hundred seven (107) days from the date of the writs for a general election to fill the vacancy. Candidates for the primary elections and independent candidates for the general election shall qualify as required in regular elections but shall file qualifying petitions before twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the sixth Thursday before the day of the primary elections. Except where this subsection (b) makes different provisions, chapter 14 of this title shall govern elections required by this subsection (b). The state primary boards shall perform their duties under chapter 8 of this title with respect to primaries held under this subsection (b) as quickly as practicable and shall certify the nominees of their parties to the county election commissions no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the thirty-fifth day before the day of the general election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1601; Acts 1980, ch. 883, § 1.

2-16-102. Establishment of congressional districts.

The general assembly shall establish the composition of districts for the election of members of the house of representatives in congress after each enumeration and apportionment of representation by the congress of the United States. The districts may not be changed between apportionments.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1602.

Law Reviews.

The Origins and Constitutionality of State Unit Voting in the Electoral College, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 2099 (2001).